it: Forma del monitor: Curvo; Piatto; Altro
fr: Forme du moniteur: Incurvée; Plate; Autre
ro-RO: Forma monitorului: Curbat; Plat; Altele
hr-HR: Oblik monitora: Zaobljeni; Ravni; Ostalo
es: Forma del monitor: Curva; Puro; Otros
th: รูปร่างจอภาพ: โค้ง; ราบ; อื่นๆ
hu: Monitor alakja: Ívelt; Lapos; Egyéb
pl: Kształt monitora: Zakrzywiony; Płaski; Inne
tr: Monitör şekli: Kavisli; Düz; Diğer
fi: Näytön muoto: Kaareva; Tasainen; Muu
zh-CN: 监视器形状: 弯曲的; 扁平的; 其他
cs: Tvar monitoru: Zaoblený; Plochý; Jiné
el: Σχήμα οθόνης: Καμπυλωτή; Επίπεδη; Άλλο
nl: Vorm monitor: Gebogen; Vlak; Andere
sv: Form på monitor: Böjd; Platt; Övrigt
ru: Форма монитора: Изогнутый; Плоский; Другой
en: Monitor shape: Curved; Flat; Other
zh-TW: 顯示器形狀: 弧形; 平坦; 其他
lt-LT: Monitoriaus forma: Lenktas; Plokščias; Kita
sk-SK: Tvar monitora: Zaoblený; Plochý; Iné
bg-BG: Форма на монитора: Извит; Плосък; Други
pt-BR: Formato do monitor: Curvada; Plana; Outro
de: Monitorform: Gebogen; Flach; Sonstiges
ko: 모니터 모양: 곡선형; 플랫; 기타
sl-SI: Oblika monitorja: Ukrivljeno; Raven; Drugo
nb: Monitorform: Buet; Flat; Annet
da: Monitorform: Buet; Flad; Andet
vi: Hình dạng màn hình: Cong; Phẳng; Khác
pt-PT: Suporte para monitor: Curvado; Plano; Outro
ja: モニタ形状: カーブド; フラット; その他